Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.285

Nursery dealer licenses—Fee surcharge.

The director may, with the advice of the nursery advisory committee, establish by rule a surcharge to the fee for a nursery dealer license. The surcharge shall not exceed twenty percent of the license fee and shall be paid at the same time that the license fee is paid. Moneys collected from the surcharge shall be deposited in the agricultural local fund and shall be used solely to support research projects which are of general benefit to the nursery industry and are recommended by the nursery advisory committee.

[ 2000 c 144 s 7; 1992 c 23 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 23: "This act shall take effect on July 1, 1992." [ 1992 c 23 s 2.]